sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ prilby: Automobilová pretekárska prilba; Motokárová prilba; Motokrosová/off-roadová prilba; Multisport/univerzálna; Prilba na snežný skúter; Prilba na UTV/ATV; Iné
fr: Type de casque compatible: Casque de course automobile; Casque de karting; Casque de motocross/tout-terrain; Multisport / universel; Casque de motoneige; Casque de SSV / quad; Autre
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta čelade: Avtomobilistična čelada; Čelada za karting; Čelada za motokros/terensko vožnjo; Za več športov/univerzalno; Čelada za motorne sani; Čelada za UTV/ATV; Drugo
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta kacige: Kaciga za automoto utrke; Kaciga za karting; Kaciga za motokros / terenska kaciga; Za više sportova / univerzalna; Kaciga za motorne sanjke; Kaciga za UTV/ATV; Ostalo
ru: Совместимый тип шлема: Шлем для автоспорта; Шлем для картинга; Шлем для мотокросса / бездорожья; Мультиспортивный / универсальный; Шлем для снегохода; Шлем для UTV / ATV; Другое
vi: Loại mũ bảo hiểm tương thích: Mũ bảo hiểm đua ô tô; Mũ bảo hiểm đua kart; Mũ bảo hiểm motocross/địa hình; Đa môn thể thao / phổ thông; Mũ bảo hiểm đua xe trượt tuyết; Mũ bảo hiểm UTV / ATV; Khác
ja: 対応ヘルメットタイプ: オートレース用ヘルメット; カート用ヘルメット; モトクロス/オフロード用ヘルメット; マルチスポーツ/ユニバーサル; スノーモービル用ヘルメット; UTV/ATV用ヘルメット; その他
es: Tipo de casco compatible: Casco de automovilismo; Casco de karting; Casco de motocross/todoterreno; Multideporte/universal; Casco de motonieve; Casco de UTV/ATV; Otro
zh-CN: 适用头盔类型: 赛车头盔; 卡丁车头盔; 越野摩托车/越野头盔; 多运动/通用; 雪地摩托车头盔; UTV/ATV 头盔; 其他
tr: Uyumlu kask tipi: Otomobil yarış kaskı; Karting kaskı; Motokros/off-road kaskı; Çoklu spor / evrensel; Kar motosikleti kaskı; UTV / ATV kaskı; Diğer
ko: 호환 헬멧 유형: 자동차 경주용 헬멧; 카트용 헬멧; 모터크로스/오프로드용 헬멧; 멀티 스포츠/범용; 스노모빌 헬멧; UTV/ATV 헬멧; 기타
zh-TW: 相容安全帽類型: 賽車安全帽; 卡丁車安全帽; 越野摩托車/越野安全帽; 綜合運動 / 通用; 雪上摩托車安全帽; UTV / ATV 安全帽; 其他
nb: Kompatibel hjelmtype: Bilsportshjelm; Gokarthjelm; Motocross-/offroadhjelm; Multisport / universell; Snøscooterhjelm; UTV- / ATV-hjelm; Annet
th: ประเภทหมวกกันน็อคที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: หมวกกันน็อกแข่งรถ; หมวกกันน็อกโกคาร์ท; หมวกกันน็อกวิบาก/ออฟโรด; มัลติสปอร์ต / อเนกประสงค์; หมวกกันน็อกสโนว์โมบิล; หมวกกันน็อก UTV / ATV; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibel hjälmtyp: Bilsportshjälm; Gokarthjälm; Motocross-/offroadhjälm; Multisport/universell; Snöskoterhjälm; UTV-/ATV-hjälm; Övrigt
fi: Yhteensopiva kypärän tyyppi: Autourheilukypärä; Karting-kypärä; Motocross- / maastokypärä; Monilaji / yleinen; Moottorikelkkakypärä; UTV- / ATV-kypärä; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de capacete compatível: Capacete de automobilismo; Capacete de karting; Capacete de motocross/todo-o-terreno; Multidesporto/universal; Capacete de mota de neve; Capacete de UTV/ATV; Outro
en: Compatible helmet type: Auto racing helmet; Karting helmet; Motocross/off-road helmet; Multi-sport / universal; Snowmobile helmet; UTV / ATV helmet; Other
bg-BG: Съвместим вид каска: Автомобилна каска; Картинг каска; Мотокрос/off-road каска; Мултиспорт / универсална; Каска за моторни шейни; UTV / ATV каска; Друго
pt-BR: Tipo de capacete compatível: Capacete de automobilismo; Capacete de kart; Capacete de motocross/off-road; Multiesporte / universal; Capacete de snowmobile; Capacete de UTV/quadriciclo (ATV); Outro
da: Kompatibel hjelmtype: Motorsportshjelm; Gokarthjelm; Motocross-/offroad-hjelm; Multisport / universel; Snescooterhjelm; UTV-/ATV-hjelm; Andet
nl: Compatibel type helm: Autosporthelm; Karthelm; Motorcross-/offroadhelm; Multisport / universeel; Sneeuwscooterhelm; UTV-/ATV-helm; Overig
cs: Kompatibilní typy helem: Automobilová přilba; Motokárová přilba; Motokrosová/terénní přilba; Multisportovní/univerzální; Přilba na sněžný skútr; Přilba pro UTV/ATV; Jiné
el: Συμβατός τύπος κράνους: Κράνος αγώνων αυτοκινήτου; Κράνος καρτ; Κράνος motocross/off-road; Πολλαπλών αθλημάτων / γενικής χρήσης; Κράνος snowmobile; Κράνος UTV / ATV; Άλλο
de: Kompatibler Helmtyp: Autorennsport-Helm; Kart-Helm; Motocross-/Offroad-Helm; Multisport/Universal; Schneemobil-Helm; UTV-/ATV-Helm; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo šalmas: Automobilių sporto šalmas; Kartingų šalmas; Motokroso / bekelės šalmas; Kelių sporto šakų / universalus; Sniego motociklų šalmas; UTV / keturračių šalmas; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de cască compatibil: Cască de curse auto; Cască de karting; Cască de motocross/off-road; Multi-sport / universală; Cască de snowmobil; Cască UTV / ATV; Altele
it: Tipo di casco compatibile: Casco per automobilismo; Casco per karting; Casco per motocross/fuoristrada; Multisport / universale; Casco per motoslitta; Casco per UTV/ATV; Altro
hu: Kompatibilis sisaktípus: Autóverseny-sisak; Gokartsisak; Motocross/off-road sisak; Többsportos / univerzális; Motoros szán sisak; UTV / ATV sisak; Egyéb
pl: Zgodny typ kasku: Kask do wyścigów samochodowych; Kask kartingowy; Kask motocrossowy / off-road; Multisportowy / uniwersalny; Kask na skuter śnieżny; Kask UTV / ATV; Inne